Vermont, session 2025-2026, H313.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Ranked-Choice Voting Study Committee * * *
Sec. 1. RANKED-CHOICE VOTING STUDY COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Ranked-Choice Voting Study Committee
to examine issues in implementing ranked-choice voting in Vermont across all
elections for State and federal offices.
(b) Membership. The Ranked-Choice Voting Study Committee shall be
composed of the following members:
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 2 of 14
(1) two current members of the House of Representatives, not from the
same political party, who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(2) two current members of the Senate, not from the same political
party, who shall be appointed by the Committee on Committees;
(3) one designee, appointed by the Secretary of State;
(4) three designees, appointed by the Vermont Municipal Clerks’ and
Treasurers’ Association, from different-sized towns, cities, and villages;
different regions; and at least one shall be from a town, city, or village that
uses a hand count in elections;
(5) one designee, appointed by the Vermont League of Cities and
Towns;
(6) a member of an organization focused on the conduct of elections,
who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(7) a member of a different organization focused on the conduct of
elections, who shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees.
(c) Powers and duties. The Ranked-Choice Voting Study Committee shall
study ranked-choice voting systems, with the goal of having any
recommendations implemented for all primary and general elections for State
and federal office occurring in 2028, including the following issues:
(1) education of voters;
(2) training of town clerks, presiding officers, and election staff;
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 3 of 14
(3) election integrity, security, and transportation of ballots;
(4) technological requirements in tabulators, hardware, and software;
(5) canvassing of votes and roles of canvassing committees;
(6) post-election processes and reporting; and
(7) other items relating to the design and implementation of ranked-
choice voting systems.
(d) Assistance. The Ranked-Choice Voting Study Committee shall have
the administrative, technical, and legal assistance of the Vermont Office of
Legislative Counsel and the Joint Fiscal Office.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2026, the Ranked-Choice Voting
Study Committee shall report to the House Committee on Government
Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government
Operations with its findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) A member of the House of Representatives designated by the
Speaker of the House shall call the first meeting of the Ranked-Choice Voting
Study Committee to occur on or before July 1, 2025.
(2) The Ranked-Choice Voting Study Committee shall select a chair
from among its members at the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the members of the Ranked-Choice Voting Study
Committee shall constitute a quorum.
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 4 of 14
(4) The Ranked-Choice Voting Study Committee shall cease to exist on
November 1, 2026.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Ranked-Choice Voting Study
Committee serving in the legislator’s capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to
per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A.
§ 23 for not more than four meetings. These payments shall be made from
monies appropriated to the General Assembly.
(2) Other members of the Ranked-Choice Voting Study Committee who
are not paid for their services by the organization for which the member is
representing on the Ranked-Choice Voting Study Committee shall be entitled
to per diem compensation as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more
than four meetings. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated
to the Office of the Secretary of State.
(h) Appropriation. The sum of $1,000.00 is appropriated to the Office of
the Secretary of State from the General Fund in fiscal year 2026 for per diem
compensation for members of the Committee.
* * * Ranked-Choice Voting for Presidential Primary Elections * * *
Sec. 2. REDESIGNATION
17 V.S.A. §§ 2705 and 2706 are redesignated as 17 V.S.A. §§ 2711 and 2712.
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 5 of 14
Sec. 3. 17 V.S.A. chapter 57, subchapter 1 is amended to read:
Subchapter 1. Presidential Primary
§ 2701. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Active candidate” means a candidate who has not been eliminated.
(2) “By lot” means a method, determined by the Secretary of State, for
randomly choosing between two or more active candidates.
(3) “Highest-ranked active candidate” means the active candidate
assigned a higher ranking than any other active candidate.
(4) “Major political party” has the same meaning as in subdivision
2103(23)(A) of this title.
(5) “Ranking” means the number available to be assigned by a voter to a
candidate to express the voter’s choice for that candidate. The number “1” is
the highest ranking, followed by “2,” and then “3,” and so on.
(6) “Round” means an instance of the sequence of voting tabulation in
accordance with section 2707 of this title.
(7) “Threshold for receiving delegates” means the number of votes
necessary for a candidate to receive delegates in a presidential primary election
conducted in accordance with subdivision 2706(a)(2) of this title.
§ 2701 2702. PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY; TIME OF HOLDING; FORM
OF BALLOT
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 6 of 14
In presidential election years, a presidential primary for each major political
party shall be held in all municipalities on the first Tuesday in March. The
Secretary of State shall prepare and distribute for use at the primary an official
ranked-choice ballot for each party for which one or more candidates qualify
for the placing of their names on the ballot under section 2702 2703 of this
title. Ballots shall be printed on index stock and configured to be readable by
vote tabulators.
§ 2702 2703. NOMINATING PETITION
* * *
§ 2703 2704. EXAMINING PETITIONS; SUPPLEMENTARY PETITIONS
The Secretary of State shall examine the petitions and ascertain whether
they conform to the provisions of this chapter, and sections 2353, 2354, and
2358 of this title. If found not to conform, he or she the Secretary shall state in
writing why a particular petition cannot be accepted, and within 72 hours from
receipt he or she the Secretary shall return it to the candidate in whose behalf it
was filed. In such case, supplementary petitions may be filed not later than 10
days after the deadline for filing petitions. However, supplementary petitions
shall not be accepted if petitions with the signatures of at least 1,000 persons
were not filed by the deadline for filing petitions set forth in section 2702 2703
of this chapter.
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 7 of 14
§ 2704 2705. RANKED-CHOICE VOTING; BALLOTS
(a) A presidential primary election for a major political party shall be
conducted by ranked-choice voting.
(b) A person voting at the primary shall be required to ask for the ranked-
choice ballot of the party in which the voter wishes to vote, and an election
official shall record the voter’s choice of ballot by marking the entrance
checklist with a letter code, as designated by the Secretary of State, to indicate
the voter’s party choice.
(1) The ballot shall allow voters to rank candidates in order of choice.
The names of all candidates on the ballot shall be listed in alphabetical order.
Each voter may vote for one candidate for the presidential nomination of one
party, either by placing a mark opposite the printed name of a candidate as in
other primaries, or by writing in the name of the candidate of the voter’s
choice.
(2) The ballot shall allow voters to assign rankings to candidates that are
equal to the number of printed candidate names and blank write-in lines,
except to the extent established by the Secretary pursuant to section 2710 of
this title.
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 8 of 14
§ 2706. TYPE OF RANKED-CHOICE VOTING
(a) At least 150 days before the date of the presidential primary election,
the State committee of each major political party shall confirm in writing with
the Secretary of State whether the party will award delegates either:
(1) on a winner-take-all basis in accordance with subsection 2707(d) of
this title; or
(2) on a proportional basis in accordance with subsection 2707(e) of this
title, in which case the party shall also indicate the applicable threshold or
thresholds for receiving delegates.
(b) If a party fails to provide notice, or its notice does not specify how the
party will award its delegates, the presidential primary election for that party
shall be tabulated on a winner-take-all basis in accordance with subsection
2707(d) of this title.
§ 2707. RANKED-CHOICE VOTING TABULATION
(a) Tabulation rounds. In any presidential primary election for a major
political party, each ballot shall count as one vote for the highest-ranked active
candidate on that ballot. Tabulation shall proceed in rounds. Each round
proceeds sequentially as described in subsection (d) or (e) of this section, as
applicable.
(b) Withdrawn candidates. If a candidate withdraws, dies, or for any
reason becomes disqualified after the ballots have been printed, the candidate
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 9 of 14
shall be treated as an eliminated candidate during tabulation unless a ranking
for that candidate is to be counted pursuant to party rule.
(c) Treatment of ballots.
(1) An undervote is a ballot that does not rank any candidates in an
election for a particular office. An undervote does not count as an active or
inactive ballot in any round of tabulation of that election.
(2) An inactive ballot is a ballot that ceases during tabulation to count
for any candidate for the remainder of tabulation of the election for that office
because either:
(A) All candidates ranked on the ballot have become inactive.
(B) The ballot includes an overvote and any candidates ranked higher
than the overvote have become inactive. An overvote occurs when a voter
ranks more than one candidate at the same ranking.
(3) During tabulation, a ballot shall remain active and continue to count
for its highest-ranked active candidate notwithstanding any skipped or repeated
rankings on the ballot. A skipped ranking occurs when a voter leaves a
ranking unassigned but ranks a candidate at a subsequent ranking. A repeated
ranking occurs when a voter ranks the same candidate at multiple rankings.
(d) Award of delegates on winner-take-all basis. If a major political party
awards all of the State’s delegates to a single candidate on a winner-take-all
basis, tabulation shall proceed as follows:
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 10 of 14
(1) If there are two or fewer active candidates, then tabulation is
complete and the candidate with the most votes is declared the winner of the
election.
(2) If there are more than two active candidates, the active candidate
with the fewest votes is eliminated, the votes for the eliminated candidate are
transferred to each ballot’s next-ranked active candidate, and a new round
begins.
(3) If there is a tie between two active candidates with the fewest votes,
the tie shall be resolved by lot to determine which candidate is defeated. The
result of the tie resolution must be recorded and reused in the event of a
recount.
(4) If there is a tie between the final two active candidates, the Secretary
of State shall notify each active candidate involved in the tie, or the candidate’s
designee, to be present at the Secretary of State’s office at a certain time. At
that time, the Secretary of State shall select the winner of the tabulation by lot.
(e) Award of delegates on proportional basis. If a major political party
awards the State’s delegates to multiple candidates on a proportional basis,
tabulation shall proceed as follows:
(1) If the vote total of every active candidate is above the threshold for
receiving delegates as confirmed by the major political party pursuant to
subdivision 2706(a)(2) of this title, then tabulation is complete.
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 11 of 14
(2) If any active candidate is below the threshold for receiving
delegates, then the active candidate with the fewest votes is eliminated, votes
for the eliminated candidate are transferred to each ballot’s next-ranked active
candidate, and a new round begins.
(3) If there is a tie between two active candidates with the fewest votes
and tabulation is not yet complete, the tie shall be resolved by lot to determine
which candidate is defeated. The result of the tie resolution must be recorded
and reused in the event of a recount.
(f) Certification of tabulation rounds. The Secretary of State shall certify
the results of each round tabulated pursuant to subsection (d) or (e) of this
section, as applicable, along with any other information required under section
2708 of this title, to the State chairperson and the national committee of each
major political party that had at least one candidate on the State-administered
presidential primary election ballot to allocate national delegate votes in
accordance with the party’s State and national rules.
(g) Priority of major political party rules. Nothing in this subchapter shall
be construed to preclude a major political party from allocating delegates
according to its own rules for allocating such delegates.
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 12 of 14
§ 2708. RANKED-CHOICE VOTING RESULTS REPORTING
(a) Unofficial preliminary round-by-round results shall be released as soon
as feasible after the polls close and at regular intervals thereafter until the
counting of ballots is complete.
(b) Unofficial preliminary ballot-level ranking data shall be made public in
a machine-readable and searchable open format not later than when the
counting of ballots is complete.
(c) Official final round-by-round results and official final ballot-level
ranking data in a machine-readable and searchable open format shall be made
public upon certification of the results.
(d) If a major political party allocates delegates by geographical unit or
district, round-by-round results by geographical unit or district shall be made
public in addition to statewide results.
§ 2709. CANVASSING COMMITTEE CERTIFICATES
When the canvassing committee provided for in section 2592 of this title
prepares its certificate of election for a presidential primary election for a
major political party, the canvass shall state the number of final round votes
received by each candidate who has received votes in the final round of
tabulation.
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 13 of 14
Sec. 4. 17 V.S.A. § 2710 is added to read:
§ 2710. RULEMAKING
The Secretary of State shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 for
the proper and efficient administration of presidential primary elections,
including procedures for ensuring that voting tabulators, voting tabulator
memory cards, and related software are able to tabulate rank-choice voting
when necessary; procedures for ensuring that the number of rankings allowed
to voters be uniform across the State for any given contest, that the number of
rankings allowed in any given contest be the maximum number allowed by the
equipment, and that the number of rankings allowed be not fewer than three in
any event; procedures for the release of round-by-round results; procedures for
requesting and conducting recounts of the results of presidential primary
elections for major candidates; and procedures for filing returns in accordance
with section 2588 of this title.
Sec. 5. TALLY SHEETS; SUMMARY SHEETS; RETURNS
The Secretary of State shall ensure that on or before January 1, 2028, all
tally sheets, summary sheets, and returns described in 17 V.S.A. § 2586 are
designed to record ranked-choice voting results in accordance with this act.
VT LEG #380888 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.313
2025 Page 14 of 14
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that Secs. 2 (redesignation),
3 (amending 17 V.S.A. chapter 57, subchapter 1), 4 (rulemaking), and 5 (tally
sheets; summary sheets; returns) shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380888 v.1